Washington statutes.
RCW 6.19.020

Application of chapter—Common law or other remedies not superseded.

An adverse claimant may assert a claim under the procedures provided in this chapter whether the levy was made under a writ of execution or of attachment and whether the writ was issued by a superior court or a district court of this state, but this chapter does not supersede common law or other remedies available to an adverse claimant before or after levy or sale.

[ 1987 c 442 s 502.]